Utah statutes.
57-8-9.   Certain work prohibited.

No unit owner shall do any work or make any alterations or changes which would jeopardize the soundness or safety of the property, reduce its value or impair any easement or hereditament, without in every such case the unanimous written consent of all the other unit owners being first obtained.

